Utah statutes.
65A-6-3.   Applications for mineral leases -- Compliance with business laws.
Applicants for mineral leases shall fully comply with all of the laws of the
state as to qualification to do business within this state and must not be in
default under any such laws during the pendency of the application and
throughout the duration of the lease.
